Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1042
Attachment; county court; procedure.

Sections 25-1039 to 25-1041 shall apply to actions before county courts.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 44;

R.S.1913, § 7771;

C.S.1922, § 8715;

C.S.1929, § 20-1042;

R.S.1943, § 25-1042;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 126.